California statutes. Labor Code
 dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred ninety-seven dollars ($297), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1995; (C) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than three hundred forty-five dollars ($345), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1996; (D) not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), nor more than three hundred forty-five dollars ($345), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2003; (E) not less than one hundred fifty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($157.50), nor more than three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2004; (F) not less than one hundred fifty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($157.50), nor more than four hundred five dollars ($405), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2005; and (G) not less than one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195), nor more than four hundred five dollars ($405), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2006.

(8) For injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2013:

(A) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating is less than 55 percent, not less than two hundred forty dollars ($240) nor more than three hundred forty-five dollars ($345).

(B) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating is 55 percent or greater but less than 70 percent, not less than two hundred forty dollars ($240) nor more than four hundred five dollars ($405).

(C) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating is 70 percent or greater but less than 100 percent, not less than two hundred forty dollars ($240) nor more than four hundred thirty-five dollars ($435).

(9) For injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2014, not less than two hundred forty dollars
 ($240) nor more than four hundred thirty-five dollars ($435).

(c) Between the limits specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), the average weekly earnings, except as provided in Sections 4456 to 4459, shall be arrived at as follows:

(1) Where the employment is for 30 or more hours a week and for five or more working days a week, the average weekly earnings shall be the number of working days a week times the daily earnings at the time of the injury.

(2) Where the employee is working for two or more employers at or about the time of the injury, the average weekly earnings shall be taken as the aggregate of these earnings from all employments computed in terms of one week; but the earnings from employments other than the employment in which the injury occurred shall not be taken at a higher rate than the hourly rate paid
 at the time of the injury.

(3) If the earnings are at an irregular rate, such as piecework, or on a commission basis, or are specified to be by week, month, or other period, then the average weekly earnings mentioned in subdivision (a) shall be taken as the actual weekly earnings averaged for this period of time, not exceeding one year, as may conveniently be taken to determine an average weekly rate of pay.

(4) Where the employment is for less than 30 hours per week, or where for any reason the foregoing methods of arriving at the average weekly earnings cannot reasonably and fairly be applied, the average weekly earnings shall be taken at 100 percent of the sum which reasonably represents the average weekly earning capacity of the injured employee at the time of his or her injury, due consideration being given to his or her actual earnings from all sources and employments.

(d) Every computation made pursuant to this section beginning January 1, 1990, shall be made only with reference to temporary disability or the permanent disability resulting from an original injury sustained after January 1, 1990. However, all rights existing under this section on January 1, 1990, shall be continued in force. Except as provided in Section 4661.5, disability indemnity benefits shall be calculated according to the limits in this section in effect on the date of injury and shall remain in effect for the duration of any disability resulting from the injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 34.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.5.

Benefits payable on account of an injury shall not be affected by a subsequent statutory change in amounts of indemnity payable under this division, and shall be continued as authorized, and in the amounts provided for, by the law in effect at the time the injury giving rise to the right to such benefits occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

4454.

In determining average weekly earnings within the limits fixed in Section 4453, there shall be included overtime and the market value of board, lodging, fuel, and other advantages received by the injured employee as part of his remuneration, which can be estimated in money, but such average weekly earnings shall not include any sum which the employer pays to or for the injured employee to cover any special expenses entailed on the employee by the nature of his employment, nor shall there be included either the cost or the market value of any savings, wage continuation, wage replacement, or stock acquisition program or of any employee benefit programs for which the employer pays or contributes to persons other than the employee or his family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

4455.

If the injured employee is under 18 years of age, and his or her incapacity is permanent, his or her average weekly earnings shall be deemed, within the limits fixed in Section 4453, to be the weekly sum that under ordinary circumstances he or she would probably be able to earn at the age of 18 years, in the occupation in which he or she was employed at the time of the injury or in any occupation to which he or she would reasonably have been promoted if he or she had not been injured. If the probable earnings at the age of 18 years cannot reasonably be determined, his or her average weekly earnings shall be taken at the maximum limit established in Section 4453.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.

Where any employee is injured while engaged on any unemployment work relief program conducted by the State, or a political subdivision, or any State or governmental agency, the disability payments due under this division shall be determined solely on the monthly earnings or anticipated earnings of such person from such program, such payments to be within the minimum and maximum limits set forth in section 4453.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

4457.

In the event the average weekly earnings of workmen associating themselves under a partnership agreement, the principal purpose of which is the performance of labor on a particular piece of work, are not otherwise ascertainable, they shall be deemed to be forty dollars ($40).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 903.)
-------------------------------------------

4458.

If a member registered as an active firefighting member of any regularly organized volunteer fire department as described in Section 3361 suffers injury or death while in the performance of his duty as fireman, or if a person engaged in fire suppression as described in Section 3365 suffers injury or death while so engaged, then, irrespective of his remuneration from this or other employment or from both, his average weekly earnings for the purposes of determining temporary disability indemnity and permanent disability indemnity shall be taken at the maximum fixed for each, respectively, in Section 4453. Four times his average annual earnings in disability cases and in death cases shall be taken at the maximum limits provided in Sections 4452 and 4702 respectively.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 953) by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

4458.2.

If an active peace officer of any department as described in Section 3362 suffers injury or death while in the performance of his or her duties as a peace officer, or if a person engaged in the performance of active law enforcement service as described in Section 3366 suffers injury or death while in the performance of that active law enforcement service, or if a person registered as a reserve peace officer of any regularly organized police or sheriff’s department as described in Section 3362.5 suffers injury or death while in the performance of his or her duties as a peace officer, then, irrespective of his or her remuneration from this or other employment or from both, his or her average weekly earnings for the purposes of determining temporary disability indemnity and permanent disability indemnity shall be taken at the maximum fixed for each, respectively, in Section 4453. Four times his or her average annual earnings in disability cases and in death cases shall be taken at the maximum limits provided in Sections 4452 and 4702 respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 30.5.)
-------------------------------------------

4458.5.

If a member suffers “an injury” following termination of active service, and within the time prescribed in Section 3212, 3212.2, 3212.3, 3212.4, 3212.5, 3212.6, 3212.7, or 3213, then, irrespective of his remuneration from any postactive service employment, his average weekly earnings for the purposes of determining temporary disability indemnity, permanent total disability indemnity, and permanent partial disability indemnity, shall be taken at the maximum fixed for each such disability, respectively, in Section 4453.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4458 (as added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 446) by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

4459.

The fact that an employee has suffered a previous disability, or received compensation therefor, does not preclude him from compensation for a later injury, or his dependents from compensation for death resulting therefrom, but in determining compensation for the later injury, or death resulting therefrom, his average weekly earnings shall be fixed at the sum which reasonably represents his earning capacity at the time of the later injury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Compensation Schedules [4550. - 4856.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4550. - 4558.]

4550.

Where liability for compensation exists under this division, such compensation shall be furnished or paid by the employer and shall be as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

4551.

Where the injury is caused by the serious and willful misconduct of the injured employee, the compensation otherwise recoverable therefor shall be reduced one-half, except:

(a) Where the injury results in death.

(b) Where the injury results in a permanent disability of 70 percent or over. 

(c) Where the injury is caused by the failure of the employer to comply with any provision of law, or any safety order of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health, with reference to the safety of places of employment.

(d) Where the injured employee is under 16 years of age at the time of injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

4552.

The reduction of compensation because of the serious and willful misconduct of an employee is not enforceable, valid, or binding in any respect until the appeals board has so determined by its findings and award as provided in Chapter 6 of Part 4 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4553.

The amount of compensation otherwise recoverable shall be increased one-half, together with costs and expenses not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), where the employee is injured by reason of the serious and willful misconduct of any of the following:

(a) The employer, or his managing representative.

(b) If the employer is a partnership, on the part of one of the partners or a managing representative or general superintendent thereof.

(c) If the employer is a corporation, on the part of an executive, managing officer, or general superintendent thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 922, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

4553.1.

In order to support a holding of serious and willful misconduct by an employer based upon violation of a safety order, the appeals board must specifically find all of the following:

(1) The specific manner in which the order was violated.

(2) That the violation of the safety order did proximately cause the injury or death, and the specific manner in which the violation constituted the proximate cause.

(3) That the safety order, and the conditions making the safety order applicable, were known to, and violated by, a particular named person, either the employer, or a representative designated by Section 4553, or that the condition making the safety order applicable was obvious, created a probability of serious injury, and that the failure of the employer, or a representative designated by Section 4553, to correct the condition constituted a reckless disregard for the probable consequences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 922, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

4554.

In case of the willful failure by an employer to secure the payment of compensation, the amount of compensation otherwise recoverable for injury or death as provided in this division shall be increased 10 percent. Failure of the employer to secure the payment of compensation as provided in Article 1 (commencing at Section 3700) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of this division is prima facie evidence of willfulness on his part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1189.)
-------------------------------------------

4555.

In case of failure by an employer to secure the payment of compensation, the appeals board may award a reasonable attorney’s fee in addition to the amount of compensation recoverable. When a fee is awarded under this section no further fee shall be allowed under Section 4903 but the provisions of Section 4903 shall be applicable to secure the payment of any fee awarded under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4555.5.

Whenever a petition to reduce an award, based upon a permanent disability rating which has become final, is denied, the appeals board may order the petitioner to pay to the injured employee all costs incident to the furnishing of X-rays, laboratory services, medical reports, and medical testimony incurred by such employee in connection with the proceeding on such petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4556.

The increases provided for by this article shall not be limited by the provisions of Chapter 1 of this part relating to maximum amounts in the computation of average earnings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 520.)
-------------------------------------------

4557.

Where the injury is to an employee under 16 years of age and illegally employed at the time of injury, the entire compensation otherwise recoverable shall be increased fifty percent (50%), and such additional sum shall be paid by the employer at the same time and in the same manner as the normal compensation benefits.

An employer shall not be held liable for the additional compensation provided by this section if such an employee is hired pursuant to a birth certificate, automobile driver’s license, or other reasonable evidence of the fact the employee is over the age of 15 years, even though such evidence of age were falsely obtained by the employee. The additional compensation provided by this section shall not exceed the maximum sum specified by Section 4553 for additional compensation payable for serious and willful misconduct on the part of an employer. This section shall not apply to the State or any of its political subdivisions or districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1621.)
-------------------------------------------

4558.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Employer” means a named identifiable person who is, prior to the time of the employee’s injury or death, an owner or supervisor having managerial authority to direct and control the acts of employees.

(2) “Failure to install” means omitting to attach a point of operation guard either provided or required by the manufacturer, when the attachment is required by the manufacturer and made known by him or her to the employer at the time of acquisition, installation, or manufacturer-required modification of the power press.

(3) “Manufacturer” means the designer, fabricator, or assembler of a power press.

(4) “Power press” means any material-forming machine that utilizes a die which is designed for use in the manufacture of other products.

(5) “Removal” means physical removal of a point of operation guard which is either installed by the manufacturer or installed by the employer pursuant to the requirements or instructions of the manufacturer.

(6) “Specifically authorized” means an affirmative instruction issued by the employer prior to the time of the employee’s physical injury or death, but shall not mean any subsequent acquiescence in, or ratification of, removal of a point of operation safety guard.

(b) An employee, or his or her dependents in the event of the employee’s death, may bring an action at law for damages against the employer where the employee’s injury or death is proximately caused by the employer’s knowing removal of, or knowing failure to install, a point of operation guard on a power press, and this removal or failure to install is specifically authorized by the employer under conditions known by the employer to create a probability of serious injury or death.

(c) No liability shall arise under this section absent proof that the manufacturer designed, installed, required, or otherwise provided by specification for the attachment of the guards and conveyed knowledge of the same to the employer. Proof of conveyance of this information to the employer by the manufacturer may come from any source.

(d) No right of action for contribution or indemnity by any defendant shall exist against the employer; however, a defendant may seek contribution after the employee secures a judgment against the employer pursuant to the provisions of this section if the employer fails to discharge his or her comparative share of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 922, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Medical and Hospital Treatment [4600. - 4615.]

4600.

(a) Medical, surgical, chiropractic, acupuncture, licensed clinical social worker, and hospital treatment, including nursing, medicines, medical and surgical supplies, crutches, and apparatuses, including orthotic and prosthetic devices and services, that is reasonably required to cure or relieve the injured worker from the effects of the worker’s injury shall be provided by the employer. In the case of the employer’s neglect or refusal reasonably to do so, the employer is liable for the reasonable expense incurred by or on behalf of the employee in providing treatment.

(b) As used in this division and notwithstanding any other law, medical treatment that is reasonably required to
 cure or relieve the injured worker from the effects of the worker’s injury means treatment that is based upon the guidelines adopted by the administrative director pursuant to Section 5307.27.

(c) Unless the employer or the employer’s insurer has established or contracted with a medical provider network as provided for in Section 4616, after 30 days from the date the injury is reported, the employee may be treated by a physician of the employee’s own choice or at a facility of the employee’s own choice within a reasonable geographic area. A chiropractor shall not be a treating physician after the employee has received the maximum number of chiropractic visits allowed by subdivision (c) of Section 4604.5.

(d) (1) If an employee has notified the employee’s
 employer in writing prior to the date of injury that the employee has a personal physician, the employee shall have the right to be treated by that physician from the date of injury if the employee has health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses on the date of injury in a plan, policy, or fund as described in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 4616.7.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), a personal physician shall meet all of the following conditions:

(A) Be the employee’s regular physician and surgeon, licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) Be the employee’s primary care physician and has previously directed the
 medical treatment of the employee, and who retains the employee’s medical records, including the employee’s medical history. “Personal physician” includes a medical group, if the medical group is a single corporation or partnership composed of licensed doctors of medicine or osteopathy, which operates an integrated multispecialty medical group providing comprehensive medical services predominantly for nonoccupational illnesses and injuries.

(C) The physician agrees to be predesignated.

(3) If the employee has health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses on the date of injury in a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and the employer is notified pursuant to paragraph
 (1), all medical treatment, utilization review of medical treatment, access to medical treatment, and other medical treatment issues shall be governed by Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. Disputes regarding the provision of medical treatment shall be resolved pursuant to Article 5.55 (commencing with Section 1374.30) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) If the employee has health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses on the date of injury in a group health insurance policy as described in Section 4616.7, all medical treatment, utilization review of medical treatment, access to medical treatment, and other medical treatment issues shall be governed by the applicable provisions of the Insurance Code.

(5) The insurer may require prior authorization of any nonemergency treatment or diagnostic service and may conduct reasonably necessary utilization review pursuant to Section 4610.

(6) An employee is entitled to all medically appropriate referrals by the personal physician to other physicians or medical providers within the nonoccupational health care plan. An employee is entitled to treatment by physicians or other medical providers outside of the nonoccupational health care plan pursuant to standards established in Article 5 (commencing with Section 1367) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) (1) When at the request of the employer, the employer’s insurer, the administrative director, the appeals board, or a workers’ compensation
 administrative law judge, the employee submits to examination by a physician, the employee is entitled to receive, in addition to all other benefits herein provided, all reasonable expenses of transportation, meals, and lodging incident to reporting for the examination, together with one day of temporary disability indemnity for each day of wages lost in submitting to the examination.

(2) Regardless of the date of injury, “reasonable expenses of transportation” includes mileage fees from the employee’s home to the place of the examination and back at the rate of twenty-one cents ($0.21) a mile or the mileage rate adopted by the Director of Human Resources pursuant to Section 19820 of the Government Code, whichever is higher, plus any bridge tolls. The mileage and tolls shall be paid to the employee at the time the employee is given
 notification of the time and place of the examination.

(f) When at the request of the employer, the employer’s insurer, the administrative director, the appeals board, or a workers’ compensation administrative law judge, an employee submits to examination by a physician and the employee does not proficiently speak or understand the English language, the employee shall be entitled to the services of a qualified interpreter in accordance with conditions and a fee schedule prescribed by the administrative director. These services shall be provided by the employer. For purposes of this section, “qualified interpreter” means a language interpreter certified, or deemed certified, pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 11435.05) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of, or Section 68566 of, the Government Code.

(g) If the injured employee cannot effectively communicate with the employee’s treating physician because the employee cannot proficiently speak or understand the English language, the injured employee is entitled to the services of a qualified interpreter during medical treatment appointments. To be a qualified interpreter for purposes of medical treatment appointments, an interpreter is not required to meet the requirements of subdivision (f), but shall meet any requirements established by rule by the administrative director that are substantially similar to the requirements set forth in Section 1367.04 of the Health and Safety Code. The administrative director shall adopt a fee schedule for qualified interpreter fees in accordance with this section. Upon request of the injured employee, the employer or insurance carrier shall pay for
 interpreter services. An employer shall not be required to pay for the services of an interpreter who is not certified or is provisionally certified by the person conducting the medical treatment or examination unless either the employer consents in advance to the selection of the individual who provides the interpreting service or the injured worker requires interpreting service in a language other than the languages designated pursuant to Section 11435.40 of the Government Code.

(h) Home health care services shall be provided as medical treatment only if reasonably required to cure or relieve the injured employee from the effects of the employee’s injury and prescribed by a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, and subject to Section 5307.1 or
 5307.8. The employer is not liable for home health care services that are provided more than 14 days prior to the date of the employer’s receipt of the physician’s prescription.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 609, Sec. 4.   (SB 1002)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.05.

(a) An employer, as defined in Section 3300, shall provide immediate support from a nurse case manager for employees injured by an act of domestic terrorism, as defined in Section 2331 of Title 18 of the United States Code,
 whose injuries arise out of and in the course of employment, to assist injured employees in obtaining medically necessary medical treatment, as defined by the medical treatment utilization schedule adopted pursuant to Section 5307.27, and to assist providers of medical services in seeking authorization of medical treatment.

(b) (1) This section shall apply only if the Governor has declared a state of emergency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8558 of the Government Code in connection with the act of domestic terrorism.

(2) Upon the issuance of a declaration pursuant to paragraph (1), an employer that has been notified of a claim for compensation arising out of the acts that resulted in the declaration shall provide a notice within three days to the claimant advising the claimant
 of medically necessary services provided pursuant to subdivision (a). In the case of a claim for compensation subject to this section that is filed after the declaration, the employer shall provide the notice to the claimant within three days. The notice shall be in the form adopted by the administrative director pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) This
 section shall not alter the conditions for compensability of an injury, as described in Sections 3208.3 and 3600.

(d) The administrative director shall adopt regulations to implement this section, including, but not limited to, the definition of a nurse case manager’s qualifications, the scope and timing of immediate support
 from a nurse case manager, and the contents of the notice that employers shall provide to claimants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   (AB 44)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.1.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), any person or entity that dispenses medicines and medical supplies, as required by Section 4600, shall dispense the generic drug equivalent.

(b) A person or entity is not required to dispense a generic drug equivalent under either of the following circumstances:

(1) When a generic drug equivalent is unavailable.

(2) When the prescribing physician specifically provides in writing that a nongeneric drug must be dispensed.

(c) For purposes of this section,
 “dispense” has the same meaning as the definition contained in Section 4024 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a prescribing physician, who is also the dispensing physician, from dispensing a generic drug equivalent.

(e) This section shall only apply to medicines dispensed prior to the operative date of the drug formulary adopted pursuant to Section 5307.27.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 525, Sec. 2.   (AB 1124)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4600, if a self-insured employer, group of self-insured employers, insurer of an employer, or group of insurers contracts with a pharmacy, group of pharmacies, or pharmacy benefit network to provide medicines and medical supplies required by this article to be provided to injured employees, those injured employees that are subject to the contract shall be provided medicines and medical supplies in the manner prescribed in the contract for as long as medicines or medical supplies are reasonably required to cure or relieve the injured employee from the effects of the injury. Medicines provided pursuant to the contract shall be subject to the drug formulary adopted by the administrative director pursuant to Section
 5307.27, and such contracts may not limit the availability of medications otherwise prescribed pursuant to the formulary based on whether the pharmacy services are provided within or outside a medical provider network.

(b) Nothing in this section shall affect the ability of employee-selected physicians to continue to prescribe and have the employer provide medicines subject to the drug formulary and medical supplies that the physicians deem reasonably required to cure or relieve the injured employee from the effects of the injury.

(c) Each contract described in subdivision (a) shall comply with standards adopted by the administrative director. In adopting those standards, the administrative director shall seek to reduce pharmaceutical costs and may consult any relevant studies or practices in other states. The standards shall provide for access to a pharmacy within a reasonable
 geographic distance from an injured employee’s residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 525, Sec. 3.   (AB 1124)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.3.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 4600, when a self-insured employer, group of self-insured employers, or the insurer of an employer contracts with a health care organization certified pursuant to Section 4600.5 for health care services required by this article to be provided to injured employees, those employees who are subject to the contract shall receive medical services in the manner prescribed in the contract, providing that the employee may choose to be treated by a personal physician, personal chiropractor, or personal acupuncturist that they have designated prior to the injury, in which case the employee shall not be treated by the health care organization. Every employee shall
 be given an affirmative choice at the time of employment and at least annually thereafter to designate or change the designation of a health care organization or a personal physician, personal chiropractor, or personal acupuncturist. The choice shall be memorialized in writing and maintained in the employee’s personnel records. The employee who has designated a personal physician, personal chiropractor, or personal acupuncturist may change their designated caregiver at any time prior to the injury. Any employee who fails to designate a personal physician, personal chiropractor, or personal acupuncturist shall be treated by the health care organization selected by the employer. If the health care organization offered by the employer is the workers’ compensation insurer that covers the employee or is an entity that controls or is controlled by that insurer, as defined by Section 1215 of the Insurance
 Code, this information shall be included in the notice of contract with a health care organization.

(2) Each contract described in paragraph (1) shall comply with the certification standards provided in Section 4600.5, and shall provide all medical, surgical, chiropractic, acupuncture, licensed clinical social worker, and hospital treatment, including nursing, medicines, medical and surgical supplies, crutches, and apparatus, including artificial members, that is reasonably required to cure or relieve the effects of the injury, as required by this division, without any payment by the employee of deductibles, copayments, or any share of the premium. However, an employee may receive immediate emergency medical treatment that is compensable from a medical service or health care provider who is not a member of the health care organization.

(3) Insured employers, a group of self-insured employers, or self-insured employers who contract with a health care organization for medical services shall give notice to employees of eligible medical service providers and any other information regarding the contract and manner of receiving medical services as the administrative director may prescribe. Employees shall be duly notified that if they choose to receive care from the health care organization they must receive treatment for all occupational injuries and illnesses as prescribed by this section.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no employer which is required to bargain with an exclusive or certified bargaining agent which represents employees of the employer in accordance with state or federal employer-employee relations
 law shall contract with a health care organization for purposes of Section 4600.5 with regard to employees whom the bargaining agent is recognized or certified to represent for collective bargaining purposes pursuant to state or federal employer-employee relations law unless authorized to do so by mutual agreement between the bargaining agent and the employer. If the collective bargaining agreement is subject to the National Labor Relations Act, the employer may contract with a health care organization for purposes of Section 4600.5 at any time when the employer and bargaining agent have bargained to impasse to the extent required by federal law.

(c) (1) When an employee is not receiving or is not eligible to receive health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses provided by the employer, if 90 days from
 the date the injury is reported the employee who has been receiving treatment from a health care organization or their physician, chiropractor, acupuncturist, or other agent notifies their employer in writing that the employee desires to stop treatment by the health care organization, they shall have the right to be treated by a physician, chiropractor, or acupuncturist or at a facility of their own choosing within a reasonable geographic area.

(2) When an employee is receiving or is eligible to receive health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries or illnesses provided by the employer, and has agreed to receive care for occupational injuries and illnesses from a health care organization provided by the employer, the employee may be treated for occupational injuries and diseases by a physician, chiropractor, or acupuncturist of
 their own choice or at a facility of their own choice
 within a reasonable geographic area if the employee or
 their physician, chiropractor, acupuncturist, or other agent notifies their employer in writing only after 180 days from the date the injury was reported, or upon the date of contract renewal or open enrollment of the health care organization, whichever occurs first, but in no case until 90 days from the date the injury was reported.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, an employer shall be deemed to provide health care coverage for nonoccupational injuries and illnesses if the employer pays more than one-half the costs of the coverage, or if the plan is established pursuant to collective bargaining.

(d) An employee and employer may agree to other forms of therapy pursuant to Section 3209.7.

(e) An
 employee enrolled in a health care organization shall have the right to no less than one change of physician on request, and shall be given a choice of physicians affiliated with the health care organization. The health care organization shall provide the employee a choice of participating physicians within five days of receiving a request. In addition, the employee shall have the right to a second opinion from a participating physician on a matter pertaining to diagnosis or treatment from a participating physician.

(f) Nothing in this section or Section 4600.5 shall be construed to prohibit a self-insured employer, a group of self-insured employers, or insurer from engaging in any activities permitted by Section 4600.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), in the event that the employer,
 group of employers, or the employer’s workers’ compensation insurer no longer contracts with the health care organization that has been treating an injured employee, the employee may continue treatment provided or arranged by the health care organization. If the employee does not choose to continue treatment by the health care organization, the employer may control the employee’s treatment for 30 days from the date the injury was reported. After that period, the employee may be treated by a physician of their own choice or at a facility of their own choice within a reasonable geographic area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 609, Sec. 5.   (SB 1002)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.35.

Any entity seeking to reimburse health care providers for health care services rendered to injured workers on a capitated, or per person per month basis, shall be licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 61.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4600.4.
